fst/prepositions.lexc
! prepositions — generated from Twanksta data
! Source: ../../data/external/twanksta_entries.json

LEXICON Prepositions
  be+Prp+GovAkk:be  # ;
  pas+Prp+GovAkk:pas  # ;
  sirzdau+Prp+GovAkk:sirzdau  # ;
  prēi+Prp+GovAkk:prēi  # ;
  ezze+Prp+GovAkk:ezze  # ;
  ezze+Prp+GovDat:ezze  # ;
  iz+Prp+GovAkk:iz  # ;
  kīrsa+Prp+GovAkk:kīrsa  # ;
  na+Prp+GovAkk:na  # ;
  nō+Prp+GovAkk:nō  # ;
  pa+Prp+GovDat:pa  # ;
  pa+Prp+GovAkk:pa  # ;
  pagār+Prp+GovAkk:pagār  # ;
  pirzdau+Prp+GovAkk:pirzdau  # ;
  pra+Prp+GovAkk:pra  # ;
  prīki+Prp+GovAkk:prīki  # ;
  prīkin+Prp+GovAkk:prīkin  # ;
  prō+Prp+GovAkk:prō  # ;
  pēr+Prp+GovAkk:pēr  # ;
  pō+Prp+GovAkk:pō  # ;
  pō+Prp+GovDat:pō  # ;
  sēn+Prp+GovAkk:sēn  # ;
  sklāit+Prp+GovAkk:sklāit  # ;
  sklāits+Prp+GovAkk:sklāits  # ;
  ēr+Prp+GovAkk:ēr  # ;
  zūrgi+Prp+GovAkk:zūrgi  # ;
  ēn+Prp+GovAkk:ēn  # ;
  ēn+Prp+GovDat:ēn  # ;
  ērgi+Prp+GovAkk:ērgi  # ;
